Missouri, session 2026, HB2363.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 193.245, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 193.245, to read as follows:
193.245. It shall be unlawful for any person to permit inspection of, or to disclose
information contained in, vital records or to copy or issue a copy of all or part of any such
record except as authorized by this law and by regulation or by order of a court of competent
jurisdiction or in the following situations:
(1) [A listing of persons who are born or who die on a particular date may be
disclosed upon request, but no information from the record other than the name and the date
of such birth or death shall be disclosed;
(2)] The department may authorize the disclosure of information contained in vital
records for legitimate research purposes;
[(3)] (2) To a qualified applicant as provided in section 193.255; and
[(4)] (3) Copies of death records over fifty years old may be disclosed upon request.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.